Tennessee, session 114, SB1000.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-6-107(b), is amended by deleting
subdivision (1) and substituting:
(1) A license remains in effect for twenty-four (24) months from the last day of
the licensee's birth month.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-6-107(b)(2), is amended by
deleting "March 1" and substituting "March 15".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1000
003128
- 1 -